Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF925.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2799HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 925 Section 1. Section 321G.13, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. A person shall not operate or ride a snowmobile with 3 a firearm in the personâs possession unless it is unloaded and 4 enclosed in a carrying case, except as otherwise provided. 5 However, a nonambulatory person may carry an uncased and 6 unloaded firearm while operating or riding a snowmobile. 7 b. (1) A person may operate or ride a snowmobile with a 8 loaded firearm, whether concealed or not, without a permit to 9 carry weapons, if the person operates or rides on land owned, 10 possessed, or rented by the person and the personâs conduct is 11 otherwise lawful. 12 (2) A person may operate or ride a snowmobile with a loaded 13 pistol or revolver, whether concealed or not, if the person is 14 operating or riding the snowmobile on land that is not owned, 15 possessed, or rented by the person, and the personâs conduct is 16 otherwise lawful. 17 c. A person shall not discharge a firearm while on a 18 snowmobile, except that a nonambulatory person may discharge a 19 firearm from a snowmobile while lawfully hunting if the person 20 is not operating or riding a moving snowmobile. 21 Sec. 2. Section 321I.14, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 2. a. A person shall not operate or ride an all-terrain 24 vehicle with a firearm in the personâs possession unless it is 25 unloaded and enclosed in a carrying case, except as otherwise 26 provided. However, a nonambulatory person may carry an uncased 27 and unloaded firearm while operating or riding an all-terrain 28 vehicle. 29 b. (1) A person may operate or ride an all-terrain vehicle 30 with a loaded firearm, whether concealed or not, without a 31 permit to carry weapons, if the person operates or rides on 32 land owned, possessed, or rented by the person and the personâs 33 conduct is otherwise lawful. 34 (2) A person may operate or ride an all-terrain vehicle with 35 -1- LSB 2799HV (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 H.F. 925 a loaded pistol or revolver, whether concealed or not, if the 1 person is operating or riding the all-terrain vehicle on land 2 that is not owned, possessed, or rented by the person, and the 3 personâs conduct is otherwise lawful. 4 c. A person shall not discharge a firearm while on an 5 all-terrain vehicle, except that a nonambulatory person may 6 discharge a firearm from an all-terrain vehicle while lawfully 7 hunting if the person is not operating or riding a moving 8 all-terrain vehicle. 9 Sec. 3. Section 805.8B, subsection 3, paragraph q, Code 10 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 11 Sec. 4. REPEAL. Section 483A.36, Code 2025, is repealed. 12